Missouri, session 2026, HB3207.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 285, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 285.685, to read as follows:
285.685. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Employee", any individual employed by an employer in this state;
(2) "Employer", any person, partnership, corporation, organization, or entity
employing ten or more employees within this state;
(3) "Pet", a domesticated animal kept for companionship including, but not
limited to, dogs, cats, rabbits, birds, and other animals legally allowed as household pets
in this state.
2. Upon the death of an employee's pet, the employer shall provide the employee
with at least three days of bereavement leave. At least one day of the leave shall be paid.
The remaining leave shall be unpaid unless the employer elects to provide additional
paid days.
3. An employer may require an employee to provide reasonable documentation
demonstrating the employee's eligibility for the bereavement leave under this section,
such as a veterinarian's certificate or other proof of pet ownership.
4. Bereavement leave under this section may be taken:
(1) Consecutively; or
(2) Nonconsecutively within thirty days following the death of the pet.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3207 2
5. Leave taken under this section shall not diminish or replace any other leave
available to the employee unless the employee voluntarily chooses to use other available
leave.
6. An employer shall not retaliate, discipline, or discriminate against any
employee for requesting or taking bereavement leave under this section.
7. An employee shall provide reasonable notice to his or her employer of the
need for bereavement leave unless providing such notice is not practicable.
8. The department of labor and industrial relations may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.
✔